Idaho, session 2026, H0912.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Chapter 2, Title 56, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 56-276, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
56-276. MEDICAID WORK REQUIREMENTS. (1) As used in this section:
(a) "Applicable individual" means an individual who is eligible
to enroll under the state medicaid program pursuant to 42 U.S.C.
1396a(a)(10)(A)(i)(VIII) or who is otherwise eligible to enroll or
is enrolled under a waiver of such plan that provides coverage that is
equivalent to minimum essential coverage and has attained the age of
nineteen (19) and is under sixty-five (65) years of age, is not preg-
nant, is not entitled to or enrolled for benefits under part A of title
XVIII of the social security act, or enrolled for benefits under part B
of title XVIII of the social security act, and is not otherwise eligible
to enroll under such plan, and is subject to work requirements.
(b) "Department" means the Idaho department of health and welfare.
(c) "Work requirements" means the requirements established by 42
U.S.C. 1396a(xx).
(2) No later than December 31, 2026, the department shall implement
work requirements for applicable individuals.
(a) No applicable individual shall be enrolled in medicaid unless, at
the time of application, the individual demonstrates compliance with
the work requirements for the three (3) consecutive months immediately
preceding the month during which the individual applies. The depart-
ment shall require documentary evidence and shall not accept self-at-
testation at the time of application.


(b) The department shall verify an applicable individual's compliance
with work requirements through state wage data, education or training
program enrollment, or verified volunteer service documentation. The
department shall verify an applicable individual's compliance with
work requirements on an ongoing basis, at least quarterly between re-
determination periods, and shall not accept self-attestation. Such
verification shall occur between periods of formal redetermination for
individuals.
(c) No applicable individual shall remain enrolled in medicaid in any
month unless the individual has demonstrated compliance with the work
requirements.
(3) An applicable individual seeking an exemption from work require-
ments shall provide documentation for the exemption sought. The department
shall verify all exemptions and shall not accept self-attestation from indi-
viduals seeking exemptions.
(a) The department shall not seek or implement any additional optional
exemptions under 42 U.S.C. 1396a(xx)(3)(B) or any other optional exemp-
tion without obtaining approval from the legislature. Such approval
shall be provided in statute.
(b) The department shall not accept exemption designations, approvals,
or determinations by a managed care organization.
(c) The department shall only approve an exemption for an individual
who is medically frail or otherwise an individual with special needs
if the individual has been medically certified by a statement from a
physician, physician's assistant, nurse, nurse practitioner, desig-
nated representative of a physician's office, a licensed or certified
psychologist, or a social worker as having a disabling mental disorder,
having a physical, intellectual, or mental disability that signif-
icantly impairs the ability to perform activities of daily living,
including eating, dressing, bathing, grooming, getting in and out of
beds and chairs, walking, going outdoors, or using the toilet, or is
in treatment for chronic substance use disorder. In no case may the
department expand the definition of "medically frail or otherwise an
individual with special needs" beyond the scope of the definition es-
tablished under 42 CFR 440.315(f).
(4) The department shall disenroll any applicable individual who fails
to comply with the work requirements.
(5) The department shall submit quarterly reports to the legislature
and the governor on compliance rates, the number and type of exemptions
granted, and the impact on medicaid enrollment, consistent with the report-
ing requirements of section 71119, P.L. 119-21.
(6) The requirements of this section shall be implemented no later than
December 31, 2026, or such earlier date as permitted by federal law and ap-
proved by the centers for medicare and medicaid services.
SECTION 2. That Chapter 2, Title 56, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 56-277, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
56-277. MEDICAID ELIGIBILITY VERIFICATION. (1) Except as required un-
der federal law, the department of health and welfare shall not accept self-


attestation of any of the following in the administration of the medicaid
program without verification before enrollment:
(a) Income;
(b) Residency;
(c) Identity;
(d) Household composition; or
(e) Citizenship or immigration status.
(2) On at least a monthly basis, the department of health and welfare
shall receive and review information concerning medicaid recipients that
indicates a change in circumstances that may affect medicaid eligibility
from:
(a) The state tax commission;
(b) The United States social security administration, including
earned income information, death register information, incarcera-
tion records, supplemental security income information, beneficiary
records, earnings information, and pension information;
(c) The United States department of health and human services, includ-
ing income and employment information maintained in the national direc-
tory of new hires database and child support enforcement data;
(d) The United States department of housing and urban development, in-
cluding payment and earnings information; and
(e) The federal bureau of investigation, including national fleeing
felon information.
(3) On at least a quarterly basis, the department of health and welfare
shall receive and review information from the department of labor concerning
medicaid recipients that indicates a change in circumstances that may affect
medicaid eligibility, including changes to employment or wages.
(4) On at least an annual basis, the department of health and welfare
shall receive and review information concerning medicaid recipients that
indicates a change in circumstances that may affect medicaid eligibility
from:
(a) The state tax commission, including adjusted gross income and fam-
ily composition; and
(b) The internal revenue service, including tax filing data, adjusted
gross income, and family composition.
(5) The department of health and welfare shall enter into any
data-sharing agreements with the agencies, departments, and bureaus de-
scribed in this section as necessary to effectuate the requirements of this
section.
(6) The department of health and welfare may contract with an indepen-
dent third party for database searches that may contain information that in-
dicates a change in circumstances that may affect medicaid applicant or re-
cipient eligibility.
(7) Upon receiving information concerning a medicaid recipient that
indicates a change in circumstances that may affect medicaid eligibility,
the department of health and welfare shall promptly conduct an eligibility
redetermination for the recipient.
(8) Unless prohibited under federal law, the department of health and
welfare shall conduct eligibility redeterminations for all nonelderly adult
medicaid recipients whose eligibility is determined based on the appli-


cation of modified adjusted gross income standards under 42 CFR 435.603,
including adults eligible under 42 U.S.C. 1396a(a)(10)(A)(i)(VIII) and 42
U.S.C. 1396u-1 at least once every six (6) months.
(9) The department of health and welfare shall conduct eligibility re-
determinations for all medicaid recipients not described in subsection (8)
of this section at least once every twelve (12) months.
SECTION 3. That Chapter 2, Title 56, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 56-278, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
56-278. INELIGIBLE ALIENS. (1) The department of health and welfare
shall not provide medical assistance to an individual in Idaho unless the in-
dividual is:
(a) A resident of the United States; and
(b) At least one (1) of the following:
(i) A citizen or national of the United States;
(ii) An alien lawfully admitted for permanent residence as an im-
migrant, as defined in 8 U.S.C. 1101(a)(15) and (20), excluding
alien visitors, tourists, diplomats, students, or other individ-
uals admitted temporarily without intent to abandon their resi-
dence in a foreign country;
(iii) An alien who has been granted the status of Cuban or Haitian
entrant, as defined in section 501(e), P.L. 96-422; or
(iv) An individual lawfully residing in the United States in ac-
cordance with a compact of free association pursuant to 8 U.S.C.
1612(b)(2)(G).
(2) The department of health and welfare shall require that all income
of ineligible household members be included when calculating financial eli-
gibility for medicaid.
(3) The department of health and welfare shall include an immigration
status on all presumptive eligibility applications submitted to the depart-
ment. The department shall require hospitals, clinics, and other qualified
entities conducting presumptive eligibility determinations to collect and
transmit such attestations to the department. No presumptive eligibility
application shall be approved unless the applicant certifies that the appli-
cant is a qualified citizen.
(4) The department of health and welfare shall verify citizen-
ship or immigration status prior to enrollment and shall conduct regular
cross-checks of applicant and recipient information against federal
databases, including the systematic alien verification for entitlements
program. A match through any electronic or data verification system shall
not, by itself, be accepted as proof of identity. Each applicant shall be
required to provide documentary proof of United States citizenship, United
States national status, or alien status eligible for medical assistance.
The department shall promptly refer any applicant identified as an individ-
ual who is not a citizen or national of the United States and does not have
lawful immigration status as defined under federal law to the United States
immigration and customs enforcement or other appropriate federal authori-
ties for further investigation and enforcement.


(5) This section shall not affect coverage for emergency medical
services provided to all individuals as required pursuant to 42 U.S.C.
1396b(v).
(6) The requirements set forth in this section shall be implemented no
later than October 1, 2026.
SECTION 4. That Chapter 2, Title 56, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 56-279, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
56-279. MULTISTATE ENROLLMENT. (1) The department of health and wel-
fare shall receive and review address change information from returned mail
by the United States postal service, the national change of address data-
base, and medicaid managed care companies operating in Utah. The department
shall conduct cross-checks of such address change information against state
medicaid enrollment at least monthly to identify enrollees who have moved
out of state. The requirements of this subsection shall be implemented no
later than January 1, 2027.
(2) The department of health and welfare shall receive and review in-
formation regarding out-of-state electronic benefit transactions and con-
duct cross-checks of such information against state medicaid enrollment at
least monthly to identify enrollees who have moved out of state. The re-
quirements of this subsection shall be implemented no later than January 1,
2027.
(3) Upon receiving information concerning a medicaid enrollee that in-
dicates a change in circumstances that may affect medicaid eligibility, in-
cluding a change in residency, the department of health and welfare shall
promptly conduct an eligibility redetermination for the enrollee.
(4) The department of health and welfare shall submit enrollment infor-
mation to the centers for medicare and medicaid services national medicaid
enrollment database every month to identify individuals enrolled in medic-
aid in multiple states at the same time. The requirements of this subsection
shall be implemented no later than October 1, 2029.
(5) No later than August 31 of each year, the department of health and
welfare shall submit an annual report to the legislature detailing the im-
plementation of the requirements established in this section. The annual
report shall be made publicly available on the department of health and wel-
fare website and shall include:
(a) The number of enrollees flagged through address change information
and out-of-state electronic benefit transactions;
(b) The number of enrollees removed from medicaid due to enrollment in
multiple states; and
(c) The estimated fiscal impact to the state due to implementing the re-
quirements of this section.
SECTION 5. That Chapter 2, Title 56, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 56-280, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:


56-280. DECEASED ENROLLEES. (1) As used in this section, "death master
file" means the database maintained by the United States social security ad-
ministration containing reported deaths.
(2) The department of health and welfare shall receive and review in-
formation from the death master file and shall conduct cross-checks of such
information against state medicaid enrollment at least monthly to identify
deceased medicaid enrollees.
(3) The department of health and welfare shall receive and review data
regarding birth and death records from the bureau of vital records and health
statistics and shall conduct cross-checks of such data against state medic-
aid enrollment at least monthly to identify deceased medicaid enrollees.
(4) The department of health and welfare shall remove any deceased en-
rollee from the medicaid program promptly upon confirmation of death.
(5) The department of health and welfare shall ensure that no medicaid
payments are made on behalf of a deceased enrollee for services rendered af-
ter the date of death.
(6) The department of health and welfare shall recoup any funds ex-
pended on deceased enrollees for capitations or services occurring after the
date of death.
(7) The requirements of this section shall be implemented no later than
January 1, 2027.
SECTION 6. That Chapter 2, Title 56, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 56-281, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
56-281. RETROACTIVE ELIGIBILITY. (1) As used in this section:
(a) "Expansion population" means individuals who are eligible for
medical assistance under 42 U.S.C. 1396a(a)(10)(A)(i)(VIII), commonly
known as the medicaid expansion population under the affordable care
act.
(b) "Medicaid" means the medical assistance program established under
title XIX of the social security act and administered by the department
of health and human services.
(c) "Non-expansion population" means all individuals eligible for med-
icaid who do not qualify under the expansion population definition, in-
cluding but not limited to pregnant women, children, elderly individu-
als, and persons with disabilities.
(d) "Retroactive eligibility" means medicaid coverage for services
provided prior to the month of application, as authorized by 42 U.S.C.
1396a(a)(34).
(2) The department of health and welfare shall limit retroactive eligi-
bility for medicaid benefits as follows:
(a) For individuals determined to be eligible as part of the expansion
population, medicaid coverage may be made retroactive for no more than
one (1) month prior to the month in which the individual submits a com-
pleted medicaid application.
(b) For individuals eligible as part of the non-expansion population,
medicaid coverage may be made retroactive for no more than two (2)
months prior to the month in which the individual submits a completed
medicaid application.


(3) The limitations set forth in subsection (2) of this section apply
only to initial applications for medicaid and do not affect eligibility for
continuous or ongoing coverage.
SECTION 7. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after its
passage and approval.